Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.210

Duty to print and distribute—Contents—Format. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

Before any primary or general election, or any special election held under RCW 29A.04.321 or 29A.04.330, each county auditor shall print and distribute a local voters' pamphlet. The pamphlet shall provide information on all measures and candidates within that jurisdiction. The format of any local voters' pamphlet shall, whenever applicable, comply with the provisions of this chapter regarding the publication of the state candidates' and voters' pamphlets.

[ 2020 c 337 s 6; 2013 c 11 s 38; 2003 c 111 s 813; 1984 c 106 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.81A.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 337: See note following RCW 29A.04.410.

PDFRCW 29A.32.210

Duty to print and distribute—Contents—Format. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

Before any primary or general election, or any special election held under RCW 29A.04.321 or 29A.04.330, each county auditor shall print and distribute a local voters' pamphlet. The pamphlet shall provide information on all measures and candidates appearing on ballots within that county. The format of any local voters' pamphlet shall, whenever applicable, comply with the provisions of this chapter regarding the publication of the state candidates' and voters' pamphlets.

[ 2024 c 78 s 7; 2020 c 337 s 6; 2013 c 11 s 38; 2003 c 111 s 813; 1984 c 106 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.81A.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 78: See note following RCW 29A.32.010.

Effective date—2020 c 337: See note following RCW 29A.04.410.